Illinois, session 104th, HB4194.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Child Care Act of 1969 is amended by adding 5Section 3.8 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 10/3.8 new)7    Sec. 3.8. Licensed day care centers; immigration 8enforcement. 9    (a) As used in this Section:10    "Immigration enforcement action" includes any arrests or 11detentions conducted by agents or officers of the United 12States Department of Homeland Security, United States 13Immigration and Customs Enforcement, or United States Customs 14and Border Protection or any other individual or entity with 15the power to arrest or detain individuals or manage custody of 16detained individuals for the purposes of civil immigration 17enforcement.18    "Law enforcement agent" means an agent of federal, State, 19or local law enforcement authorized with the power to arrest 20or detain individuals or manage the custody of detained 21individuals for a law enforcement purpose, including civil 22immigration enforcement.23    (b) A licensed day care center shall not disclose or   HB4194- 2 -LRB104 16121 AAS 29454 b1threaten to disclose to any other person, entity, or agency 2information regarding or relating to the actual or perceived 3citizenship or immigration status of a child or an associated 4person, unless disclosure is required by State or federal law. 5Nothing in this Section shall be construed to prohibit or 6restrict a licensed day care center from sending to or 7receiving from the United States Department of Homeland 8Security or any other federal, State, or local governmental 9entity information regarding the citizenship or immigration 10status of an individual pursuant to 8 U.S.C. 1373 and 8 U.S.C. 111644.12    (c) This Section does not affect a licensed day care 13center's obligation as a mandated reporter or to otherwise 14respond to instances of suspected crime on the premises. This 15Section does not prohibit a licensed day care center from 16interacting with law enforcement agents for the purposes of 17hotline emergency calls or incidents arising out of mandated 18reporting. 19    (d) The Department of Children and Family Services or the 20Department of Early Childhood, whichever is applicable, shall 21make available on its website resources for families, 22including, but not limited to, resources regarding the 23constitutional rights of families, family preparedness plans, 24and a copy of the Department of Children and Family Services' 25appointment of short-term guardian form (Form CFS 444-2 or its 26predecessor or successor form).  HB4194- 3 -LRB104 16121 AAS 29454 b1    (e) If a child's parent or guardian directly faces 2immigration enforcement action, a licensed day care center 3shall use the child's emergency contact information and 4release the child to the persons designated as the child's 5emergency contacts or into the custody of an individual who 6presents a properly executed appointment of short-term 7guardian form on behalf of the child.8    (f) A licensed day care center shall adopt policies by 9January 1, 2026 to comply with this Section and shall ensure 10that all staff members are trained on the adopted policies. 11The policies shall not have the effect of excluding or 12discouraging a child from any program at the licensed day care 13center because of the actual or perceived immigration status 14of the child or the child's parent or guardian. The policies 15shall require the following:16        (1) a written plan of action for interacting with law 17    enforcement agents to be shared with a child's parent or 18    guardian and include the following:19            (A) a designation of spaces deemed to be private 20        within the facility;21            (B) a designation of the day care center director 22        or the day care center director's designee as the 23        primary point of contact for interacting with law 24        enforcement agents; and25            (C) procedures that a day care center's primary 26        point of contact must follow when responding and   HB4194- 4 -LRB104 16121 AAS 29454 b1        reviewing a request for entry by law enforcement, 2        including a judicial warrant or order or a subpoena; 3        (2) procedures for notifying and seeking written 4    consent from a child's parents or guardian if a law 5    enforcement agent requests access to personally 6    identifiable information from the child's records, unless 7    such access is in compliance with a judicial warrant or 8    order or a subpoena that restricts the disclosure of the 9    information to the child's parents or guardian;10        (3) families enrolled at the licensed day care center 11    to update their emergency contact list biannually; and12        (4) notification to be given, within a reasonable time 13    period, to parents or guardians and the Department if 14    immigration enforcement action occurs at the licensed day 15    care center or its environs.16    A licensed day care center's late pick-up policy shall be 17updated to include the degree of diligence the licensed day 18care center will use to reach a child's emergency contacts, 19including the number of attempted phone calls to parents and 20emergency contacts and any requests for police assistance in 21finding a child's emergency contact. 22    (g) Failure to comply with subsection (b) of this Section 23shall result in a formal licensing violation. Failure to 24comply with any other provision of this Section may result in a 25licensing violation. 26    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon   HB4194- 5 -LRB104 16121 AAS 29454 b1becoming law.